Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Abatement of Illegal Uses of Premises.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing nuisances in general, see AS

09.45.230

—

09.45.250

.

Sec. 09.50.170.
Abatement of places used for certain acts.

A person who erects, establishes, continues, maintains, uses, owns, or leases a building, structure, or other place used for one of the following activities is guilty of maintaining a nuisance, and the building, structure, or place, or the ground itself in or upon which or in any part of which the activity is conducted, permitted, carried on, continues, or exists, and its furniture, fixtures, and other contents, constitute a nuisance and may be enjoined and abated:

prostitution;

an illegal activity involving a place of prostitution; or

an illegal activity involving

alcoholic beverages;

a controlled substance;

an imitation controlled substance; or

gambling or promoting gambling.

In this section, “illegal activity involving alcoholic beverages,” “illegal activity involving a controlled substance,” “illegal activity involving gambling or promoting gambling,” “illegal activity involving an imitation controlled substance,” “illegal activity involving a place of prostitution,” and “prostitution” have the meanings given in AS

34.03.360

.

History.

(§ 20.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am §§ 8, 9 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 09.50.175.
Admissibility of evidence to prove nuisance.

In an action brought under AS

09.50.170(a)

to prove the existence of a nuisance, the court may consider

evidence of reputation within a community;

evidence derived from records of the courts of the state or of the United States that relate to previous complaints concerning alleged violations of, and to arrests for or convictions of violations of, laws based on activity set out in AS

09.50.170

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 09.50.180.
Injunction.

When there is reason to believe that a nuisance as defined in AS

09.50.170

—

09.50.240

exists, the attorney general shall, or a citizen, or a home rule municipality if the nuisance is located in the home rule municipality, may, bring an action to perpetually enjoin the nuisance, the person maintaining it, and the owner, lessee, or agent of the building or group upon which the nuisance exists.

History.

(§ 20.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For court rule on injunctions generally, see Civ. R. 65.

Sec. 09.50.190.
Dismissal.

If the complaint is filed by a citizen, the action may be dismissed only upon approval of the attorney general and affidavit of the complainant and the complainant’s attorney giving the reasons why the suit should be dismissed.
The court may refuse to dismiss the suit and may direct the attorney general to prosecute the action.

History.

(§ 20.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.200.
Contempt proceeding.

If an injunction granted under the provisions of AS

09.50.170

—

09.50.240

is violated, the court may summarily try and punish the offender.
A party found guilty of contempt under the provisions of AS

09.50.170

—

09.50.240

is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not less than three months nor more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 20.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For contempt procedures, see Civ.
R. 90.

Sec. 09.50.210.
Order of abatement.

If the court finds and enters judgment that a nuisance exists, the court shall enter an order of abatement. The order of abatement must direct

termination of the lease or rental agreement, if any, on the premises subject to the order of abatement, if the tenant who occupies under the lease or rental agreement has been given notice of the proceedings under AS

09.50.170

—

09.50.240

;

the removal from the building or place of the fixtures, furniture, and movable property used in the nuisance and their sale in the manner provided for the sale of chattels under execution;

the closing of the building or place against its use for any purpose for a period of one year unless sooner released.

A person who breaks and enters or uses a building, structure, or other place directed to be closed by an order entered under (a)(3) of this section is guilty of contempt and shall be punished for contempt as provided in AS

09.50.200

.

History.

(§ 20.05 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 11 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 09.50.220.
Proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of the sale of the contents shall be applied as follows:

to the payment of fees and costs of the removal and sale;

to payment of the allowances and costs of closing and keeping closed the buildings or places;

to the payment of plaintiff’s costs;

to the payment of any balance remaining to the owner of the property sold.

If the proceeds do not fully discharge all the costs, fees, and allowances, the premises may also be sold under execution issued upon the order of the court and the proceeds of the sale applied in like manner. However, the building or realty in which the nuisance is conducted or real estate on which it stands may not be subject to a lien, judgment, or costs unless the owner, or an agent or representative of the owner, has been duly served with process in the action and been given an opportunity to show good faith and to immediately abate the nuisance.

History.

(§ 20.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.230.
Release of premises to owner.

The court may order premises abated under AS

09.50.210

delivered to the owner and cancel the order of abatement if the owner of the premises

has not been guilty of a contempt in the proceedings;

appears and pays all costs, fees, and allowances that are a lien on the premises; and

files a bond with sureties approved by the court in an amount determined by the court to the effect that the owner will abate the nuisance that exists at the building or place and prevent the nuisance from being established within a period of one year thereafter.

The lease of the property does not release it from a judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject by law.

A cancellation of the order of abatement does not affect a termination of a lease or rental agreement made under AS

09.50.210(a)(1)

.

History.

(§ 20.07 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 12 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 09.50.240.
Fine for contempt as lien on premises.

A fine imposed as punishment for contempt against the owner is a lien upon the premises to the extent of the interest of that person in the premises and is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by the order of the court.

History.

(§ 20.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)